Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.050

Fiscal—Investment of funds.

Excess and inactive funds on hand in the treasury of any code city may be invested in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as provided for city and town funds in all applicable statutes, including, but not limited to the following: RCW 35.39.030, 35.58.510, 35.81.070, 35.82.070, 36.29.020, 39.58.020, 39.58.080, 39.58.130, 39.60.010, 39.60.020, 41.16.040, 68.52.060, and 68.52.065.

The responsibility for determining the amount of money available in each fund for investment purposes shall be placed upon the department, division, or board responsible for the administration of such fund.

Moneys thus determined available for this purpose may be invested on an individual fund basis or may, unless otherwise restricted by law be commingled within one common investment portfolio for the mutual benefit of all participating funds: PROVIDED, That if such moneys are commingled in a common investment portfolio, all income derived therefrom shall be apportioned among the various participating funds or the general or current expense fund as the governing body of the code city determines by ordinance or resolution.

Any excess or inactive funds on hand in the city treasury not otherwise invested for the specific benefit of any particular fund, may be invested by the city treasurer in United States government bonds, notes, bills or certificates of indebtedness for the benefit of the general or current expense fund.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 28; 2007 c 64 s 1; 1987 c 331 s 77; 1983 c 66 s 2; 1983 c 3 s 64; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 331: See RCW 68.05.900.

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.